Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4518.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [515B.5-101] COMMON INTEREST COMMUNITY REGISTRATION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the terms defined in this subdivision have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Association" has the meaning given in section 515B.1-103, clause (4). new text end new text begin (c) "Common interest community" has the meaning given in section 515B.1-103, clause (10). new text end new text begin (d) "Master declaration" has the meaning given in section 515B.1-103, clause (22). new text end new text begin (e) "Master developer" has the meaning given in section 515B.1-103, clause (23). new text end new text begin (f) "Unit" has the meaning given in section 515B.1-103, clause (35). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The Department of Commerce must establish a register that contains the information required under subdivision 3 regarding each residential common interest community or similar association governed by this chapter, operating within Minnesota. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Registration required. new text end new text begin (a) A residential common interest community or similar association governed by this chapter must annually register under this section if the common interest community or similar association owns any number of units in Minnesota. new text end new text begin (b) A residential common interest community or similar association governed by this chapter must provide the following information to the department when registering: new text end new text begin (1) the common interest community or association's legal name; new text end new text begin (2) the common interest community or association's federal employer identification number; new text end new text begin (3) the common interest community or association's telephone number, email address, and mailing and physical address; new text end new text begin (4) the current board officers' full names, titles, email addresses, and other contact information; new text end new text begin (5) a copy of the common interest community or association's governing documents, including but not limited to declarations, bylaws, rules, and any amendments; new text end new text begin (6) the total number of parcels in the common interest community or association; and new text end new text begin (7) the total amount of revenues and expenses from the common interest community or association's annual budget. new text end new text begin (c) For residential common interest communities or associations governed by this chapter that are under the control of a master developer, the register must include: new text end new text begin (1) the master developer's legal name; new text end new text begin (2) the master developer's telephone number, email address, and mailing and physical address; new text end new text begin (3) the master developer's federal employer identification number; new text end new text begin (4) the total number of parcels owned by the master developer on the date of reporting; new text end new text begin (5) the master developer's master declaration required under section 515B.2-121; new text end new text begin (6) the master developer's anticipated timeline to transfer control to the owners; and new text end new text begin (7) how the master developer transfers control to the owners. new text end new text begin (d) Residential common interest communities or associations governed by this chapter that contract with a property management company must also provide the following information: new text end new text begin (1) the property management company's legal name; new text end new text begin (2) the property management company's telephone number, email address, and mailing and physical address; and new text end new text begin (3) a brief description of the property management company's legal obligations under the terms of the contract. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Registration fee. new text end new text begin Each residential common interest community or association must pay an annual registration fee of $55 to support the register established in subdivision 2 and the common interest community ombudsperson under section 45.0137. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Data classification. new text end new text begin Data collected, created, received, or maintained pursuant to this section is private data on individuals, as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 12. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Notice requirement. new text end new text begin The Department of Commerce must provide notice to a common interest community or association that fails to register. The common interest community or association must register as provided under this section within 60 days after receiving the notice to register. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end